Washington statutes.
RCW 16.65.320

Investigations by director—Complaints.

For the purpose of enforcing the provisions of this chapter, the director on the director's own motion or upon the verified complaint of any vendor or consignor against any licensee, or agent, or any person assuming or attempting to act as such, shall have full authority to make any and all necessary investigations. The director is empowered to administer oaths of verification of such complaints.

[ 1985 c 415 s 10; 1959 c 107 s 32.]